Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Chapter 12

Mine Rescue Operations [Repealed]

59-12-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1979, ch. 368, § 1; T.C.A., § 58-1701; Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 43; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 168, § 1, effective April 18, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. The former chapter (Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 38, §§ 1-7; Shan., §§ 3079a167-3079a185; Code 1932, §§ 5658-5676; Acts 1953, ch. 86, §§ 75-93 (Williams, §§ 5638.75-5638.93, 5658-5676); modified; Acts 1955, ch. 238, § 9; 1972, ch. 459, §§ 1, 2), concerning rescue stations, was repealed by Acts 1979, ch. 368, § 9.

Former chapter 12 §§59-12-101 –59-12-108 concerned mine rescue operations.

59-12-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1979, ch. 368, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 58-1702; Acts 1985, ch. 288, §§ 39, 40; 1996, ch. 751, § 1; 1999, ch. 520, § 43; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 168, § 1, effective April 18, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. The former chapter (Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 38, §§ 1-7; Shan., §§ 3079a167-3079a185; Code 1932, §§ 5658-5676; Acts 1953, ch. 86, §§ 75-93 (Williams, §§ 5638.75-5638.93, 5658-5676); modified; Acts 1955, ch. 238, § 9; 1972, ch. 459, §§ 1, 2), concerning rescue stations, was repealed by Acts 1979, ch. 368, § 9.

Former chapter 12 §§59-12-101 –59-12-108 concerned mine rescue operations.

59-12-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1979, ch. 368, § 3; T.C.A., § 58-1703; Acts 1985, ch. 288, §§ 41, 42; 1999, ch. 520, § 43; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 168, § 1, effective April 18, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. The former chapter (Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 38, §§ 1-7; Shan., §§ 3079a167-3079a185; Code 1932, §§ 5658-5676; Acts 1953, ch. 86, §§ 75-93 (Williams, §§ 5638.75-5638.93, 5658-5676); modified; Acts 1955, ch. 238, § 9; 1972, ch. 459, §§ 1, 2), concerning rescue stations, was repealed by Acts 1979, ch. 368, § 9.

Former chapter 12 §§59-12-101 –59-12-108 concerned mine rescue operations.

59-12-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1979, ch. 368, § 4; T.C.A., § 58-1704; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 168, § 1, effective April 18, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. The former chapter (Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 38, §§ 1-7; Shan., §§ 3079a167-3079a185; Code 1932, §§ 5658-5676; Acts 1953, ch. 86, §§ 75-93 (Williams, §§ 5638.75-5638.93, 5658-5676); modified; Acts 1955, ch. 238, § 9; 1972, ch. 459, §§ 1, 2), concerning rescue stations, was repealed by Acts 1979, ch. 368, § 9.

Former chapter 12 §§59-12-101 –59-12-108 concerned mine rescue operations.

59-12-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1979, ch. 368, § 5; T.C.A., § 58-1705; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 168, § 1, effective April 18, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. The former chapter (Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 38, §§ 1-7; Shan., §§ 3079a167-3079a185; Code 1932, §§ 5658-5676; Acts 1953, ch. 86, §§ 75-93 (Williams, §§ 5638.75-5638.93, 5658-5676); modified; Acts 1955, ch. 238, § 9; 1972, ch. 459, §§ 1, 2), concerning rescue stations, was repealed by Acts 1979, ch. 368, § 9.

Former chapter 12 §§59-12-101 –59-12-108 concerned mine rescue operations.

59-12-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1979, ch. 368, § 8; T.C.A., § 58-1706; 1999, ch. 520, § 43; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 168, § 1, effective April 18, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. The former chapter (Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 38, §§ 1-7; Shan., §§ 3079a167-3079a185; Code 1932, §§ 5658-5676; Acts 1953, ch. 86, §§ 75-93 (Williams, §§ 5638.75-5638.93, 5658-5676); modified; Acts 1955, ch. 238, § 9; 1972, ch. 459, §§ 1, 2), concerning rescue stations, was repealed by Acts 1979, ch. 368, § 9.

Former chapter 12 §§59-12-101 –59-12-108 concerned mine rescue operations.

59-12-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 1979, ch. 368, § 6; T.C.A., § 58-1707; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 168, § 1, effective April 18, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. The former chapter (Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 38, §§ 1-7; Shan., §§ 3079a167-3079a185; Code 1932, §§ 5658-5676; Acts 1953, ch. 86, §§ 75-93 (Williams, §§ 5638.75-5638.93, 5658-5676); modified; Acts 1955, ch. 238, § 9; 1972, ch. 459, §§ 1, 2), concerning rescue stations, was repealed by Acts 1979, ch. 368, § 9.

Former chapter 12 §§59-12-101 –59-12-108 concerned mine rescue operations.

59-12-108. [Repealed.]

Acts 1992, ch. 574, § 9; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 168, § 1, effective April 18, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12 §§59-12-101 –59-12-108 concerned mine rescue operations.